South Dakota, session 2026, SB30.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 12-4-59 be AMENDED:
12-4-59. An application for the correction of any precinct registration list or to
challenge the right to vote of any registered voter may be filed by the secretary of state,
the auditor of the county where the challenged voter is registered, or any other individual
who is registered as a voter in the same county where the challenged voter is registered,
not later than the ninetieth day before the day of a primary, runoff, special, or general
election. The application for correction filed pursuant to this section may challenge only
whether a voter:
(1) Has voted or has registered to vote in another state;
(2) Is a resident of this state, as defined in § 12-1-4; or
(3) Is a United States citizen.

26.307.16 2 30
An Act to amend the reasons for challenging an individual's eligibility to vote.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
Senate as Bill No. 30
By
Secretary of the Senate for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
President of the Senate ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Secretary of the Senate
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
Speaker of the House
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of State
Senate Bill No. 30 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
SB30 ENROLLED